Utah statutes.
47-3-2.   Assumption of risk.

Each person who participates in shooting at a shooting range accepts the associated risks to the extent the risks are obvious and inherent.  Those risks include injuries that may result from noise, discharge of projectile or shot, malfunction of shooting equipment not owned by the shooting range, natural variations in terrain, surface or subsurface snow or ice conditions, bare spots, rocks, trees, and other forms of natural growth or debris.

